Utah statutes.
63C-11-311.   Ringside physician.
(1)  The commission shall maintain a list of ringside physicians who hold a
Doctor of Medicine (MD) degree and are registered with the commission as
approved to act as a ringside physician and meet the requirements of
Subsection (2).
(2) (a)  The commission shall appoint a registered ringside physician to
perform the duties of a ringside physician at each contest held pursuant to
this chapter.
(b)  The promoter of a contest shall pay a fee determined by the commission by
rule to the commission for a ringside physician.
(3)  An applicant for registration as a ringside physician shall:
(a)  submit an application for registration;
(b)  provide the commission with evidence of the applicant's licensure to
practice medicine in the state; and
(c)  satisfy minimum qualifications established by the department by rule.
(4)  A ringside physician at attendance at a contest:
(a)  may stop the contest at any point if the ringside physician determines
that a contestant's physical condition renders the contestant unable to safely
continue the contest; and
(b)  works under the direction of the commission.
